Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
Article 3 Rights and Responsibilities of Ward

29-5-20.
Rights of adult ward; impact on right to vote or testamentary capacity.

In every conservatorship the ward has the right to:

A qualified conservator who acts in the best interest of the ward;

A conservator who is reasonably accessible to the ward;

Have the ward’s property utilized as necessary to provide adequately for the ward’s support, care, education, health, and welfare;

Communicate freely and privately with persons other than the conservator, except as otherwise ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction;

Individually, or through the ward’s representative or legal counsel, bring an action relating to the conservatorship, including the right to file a petition alleging that the ward is being unjustly denied a right or privilege granted by Chapter 4 of this title and this chapter and the right to bring an action to modify or terminate the conservatorship pursuant to the provisions of Code Sections 29-5-71 and 29-5-72;

The least restrictive form of conservatorship, taking into consideration the ward’s functional limitations, personal needs, and preferences; and

Be restored to capacity at the earliest possible time.

The appointment of a conservator is not a determination regarding the right of the ward to vote.

The appointment of a conservator is not a determination that the ward lacks testamentary capacity.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-5-21.
Rights and powers removed from ward.

Unless the court’s order specifies that one or more of the following powers are to be retained by the ward, the appointment of a conservator shall remove from the ward the power to:

Make, modify, or terminate contracts, other than the power to contract marriage;

To buy, sell, or otherwise dispose of or encumber property;

Enter into or conduct other business or commercial transactions;

Revoke a revocable trust established by the ward; and

Bring or defend any action at law or equity, except an action relating to the conservatorship.

The mere appointment of a conservator does not revoke the powers of an agent who was previously appointed by the ward to act as the ward’s agent under a durable power of attorney for health care, health care agent under an advance directive for health care, or mental health care agent under a psychiatric advance directive.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 10/HB 24; Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 2-8/HB 752.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in subsection (b), substituted “health care, health care agent” for “health care or health care agent” and added “, or mental health care agent under a psychiatric advance directive” at the end.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 1/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “(a) The General Assembly has long recognized the right of the individual to control all aspects of his or her personal care and medical treatment, including the right to insist upon medical treatment, decline medical treatment, or direct that medical treatment be withdrawn.
In order to secure these rights, the General Assembly has adopted and amended statutes recognizing the living will and health care agency and provided statutory forms for both documents.

“(b) The General Assembly has determined that the statutory forms for the living will and durable power of attorney for health care are confusing and inconsistent and that the statutes providing for the living will and health care agency contain conflicting concepts, inconsistent and out-of-date terminology, and confusing and inconsistent requirements for execution. In addition, there is a commendable trend among the states to combine the concepts of the living will and health care agency into a single legal document.

“(c) The General Assembly recognizes that a significant number of individuals representing the academic, medical, legislative, and legal communities, state officials, ethics scholars, and advocacy groups worked together to develop the advance directive for health care contained in this Act, and the collective intent was to create a form that uses understandable and everyday language in order to encourage more citizens of this state to execute advance directives for health care.

“(d) The General Assembly finds that the clear expression of an individual’s decisions regarding health care, whether made by the individual or an agent appointed by the individual, is of critical importance not only to citizens but also to the health care and legal communities, third parties, and families. In furtherance of these purposes, the General Assembly enacts a new Chapter 32 of Title 31, setting forth general principles governing the expression of decisions regarding health care and the appointment of a health care agent, as well as a form of advance directive for health care.”

Law reviews.

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (2008).

29-5-22.
Obligations and liabilities of conservator.

Except as otherwise provided by law or by the court, a conservator shall receive, collect, and make decisions regarding the ward’s property. A conservator shall, to the extent feasible, encourage the ward to participate in decisions, act on the ward’s own behalf, and develop or regain the ability to manage the ward’s property. A conservator, in making decisions, shall consider the expressed desires and personal values of the ward which are known to the conservator. A conservator shall at all times act as a fiduciary in the ward’s best interest and exercise reasonable care, diligence, and prudence.

A conservator shall:

Respect the rights and dignity of the ward;

Be reasonably accessible to the ward and maintain regular communication with the ward;

If necessary, petition to have a guardian appointed;

Endeavor to cooperate with the guardian, if any;

Provide for the support, care, education, health, and welfare of the ward and persons who are entitled to be supported by the ward, to the extent consistent with the current and future needs and resources of the ward;

Give such bond as required by Code Section 29-5-40;

Within two months of appointment, file with the court and provide to the guardian, if any, an inventory of the ward’s property and a plan for administering the property, pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 29-5-30.

Take into account any estate plan of the ward known to the conservator in the administration of the conservatorship;

Keep accurate records, including adequate supporting data, and file annual returns, as required by Code Section 29-5-60;

Promptly notify the court of any change in the ward’s condition that in the opinion of the conservator might require modification or termination of the conservatorship;

Promptly notify the court of any conflict of interest between the ward and the conservator when the conflict arises or becomes known to the conservator and take such action as is required by Code Section 29-5-24; and

Keep the court informed of the conservator’s current address.

A conservator, solely by reason of the conservator-ward relationship, is not personally liable for:

The ward’s expenses or the expenses of those entitled to be supported by the ward;

Contracts entered into in the conservator’s fiduciary capacity;

The acts or omissions of the ward;

Obligations arising from ownership or control of property of the ward; or

Other acts or omissions occurring in the course of the conservatorship.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

Cross references.

Service of process on guardian of incapacitated adult, § 9-11-4(l)(4).

Bond required of guardians of minors, §

29-4-12

.

Administrator’s duty to file inventory, § 53-7-75 (Pre-1998 Probate Code).

29-5-23.
Authority of conservator; cooperation with guardian or other interested parties.

Unless inconsistent with the terms of any court order relating to the conservatorship, a conservator without court order may:

Make reasonable disbursements from the annual income or, if applicable, from the annual budget amount that has been approved by the court pursuant to Code Section 29-5-30 for the support, care, education, health, and welfare of the ward and those persons who are entitled to be supported by the ward;

Enter into contracts for labor or service upon such terms as the conservator may deem best, but only to the extent that the annual compensation payable under such contracts, when combined with other anticipated disbursements, does not exceed the amount of the annual income or, if applicable, the annual budget amount that has been approved by the court pursuant to Code Section 29-5-30;

Borrow money for one year or less and bind the ward or the ward’s property, but only if the amount of the annual payments, when combined with other anticipated disbursements, does not exceed the amount of the annual income or, if applicable, the annual budget amount that has been approved by the court pursuant to Code Section 29-5-30 and only if done for purposes of paying the ward’s debts, repairing the ward’s dwelling place, or providing for the support, care, education, health, or welfare of the ward and the persons who are entitled to be supported by the ward;

Receive, collect, and hold the ward’s property, additions to the ward’s property, and all related records;

Retain the property received by the conservator upon the creation of the conservatorship in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 29-5-31;

Bring, defend, or participate in legal, equitable, or administrative proceedings, including alternative dispute resolution, as are appropriate for the support, care, education, health, or welfare of the ward in the name of or on behalf of the ward;

Fulfill, as far as possible, or, to the extent permitted by law, disaffirm the executory contracts and comply with the executed contracts of the ward;

Revoke a revocable trust set up by the ward or exercise such other powers of revocation, amendment, or withdrawal that are exercisable by the ward, but only if the governing instrument expressly allows a conservator to revoke the trust or exercise the powers;

Examine the will and any other estate planning documents of the ward;

Appoint an attorney in fact to act for the conservator when the conservator is unable to act; provided, however, that the conservator and the conservator’s sureties shall be bound for the acts of the attorney as if the acts were the personal acts of the conservator;

Invest the ward’s property pursuant to the provisions of Code Sections 29-5-32 and 29-5-33;

Sell the ward’s stocks and bonds pursuant to the provisions of subsection (b) of Code Section 29-5-35;

Compromise any contested or doubtful claim for or against the ward if the proposed gross settlement as defined in Code Section 29-3-3 is in the amount of $25,000.00 or less; and

Release the debtor and compromise all debts in the amount of $25,000.00 or less when the collection of the debt is doubtful.

In the petition for appointment, or at any time during the conservatorship, the conservator may request the continuing power:

To invest the ward’s property in investments other than those authorized in Code Section 29-5-32, pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 29-5-34, without further court approval of any investment;

To sell, rent, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of any or all of the ward’s real or personal property without complying with the provisions of Code Section 29-5-35 other than the provisions for additional bond set forth in subsection (e) of Code Section 29-5-35;

To continue the operation of any farm or business in which the ward has an interest; or

To access the digital assets of the ward, pursuant to Code Section 53-13-20.

Unless the request for the powers described in paragraph (1) of this subsection is made in the petition for the initial appointment of the conservator, the court shall order a hearing as the court deems appropriate. Notice shall be given by personal service to the ward and a guardian ad litem appointed for the ward. Notice shall be given by first-class mail to the guardian of the ward, if any; the surety on the conservator’s bond; and to the following relatives of the ward whose whereabouts are known:

The spouse of the ward; and

All adult children of the ward; or

If there is no adult child, then at least two adults in the following order of priority:

Lineal descendants of the ward;

Parents and siblings of the ward; and

Friends of the ward.

At the time of the appointment of the conservator or at any time thereafter, and after appointment of a guardian ad litem for the ward and a hearing as the court deems appropriate, any of the following powers may be specifically granted to the conservator on a case-by-case basis, upon notice as the court shall determine:

To make disbursements that exceed by no more than a specific amount the annual income or, if applicable, the annual budget amount that has been approved by the court pursuant to Code Section 29-5-30 for the support, care, education, health, and welfare of the ward and those persons who are entitled to be supported by the ward;

To enter into contracts for labor or service for which the compensation payable under such contracts, when combined with other disbursements from the estate, exceeds the annual income or, if applicable, the annual budget amount that has been approved by the court pursuant to Code Section 29-5-30;

To make specific investments of the ward’s property that do not comply with the provisions of Code Section 29-5-32, pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 29-5-34;

To sell, rent, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of specific items of the ward’s real or personal property without complying with the provisions of Code Section 29-5-35 other than the provisions for additional bond set forth in subsection (e) of Code Section 29-5-35;

To compromise a contested or doubtful claim for or against the ward if the proposed gross settlement as defined in Code Section 29-3-3 is more than $25,000.00;

To release the debtor and compromise all debts for which the collection is doubtful when the amount of the debt is $25,000.00 or more;

To use the ward’s property to erect a dwelling for the ward or make an addition or renovation to the ward’s dwelling place;

To establish or add property to a trust for the benefit of the ward and, if applicable, those individuals who are entitled to support from the ward; provided, however, unless otherwise provided by court order pursuant to Code Section 29-5-36, the trust must provide that the ward may revoke the trust if the ward is restored to capacity and the trust shall terminate upon the ward’s death and any property remaining in the trust shall be paid to the ward’s estate;

To disclaim or renounce any property or interest in property of the ward in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 53-1-20;

To access the digital assets of the ward pursuant to Code Section 53-13-20;

To engage in estate planning for the ward pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 29-5-36; and

To perform such other acts as may be in the best interest of the ward.

In granting any of the powers described in subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section, the court shall consider the views of the guardian, if available, or, if there is no guardian, of others who have custody of the ward.

In performing any of the acts described in this Code section, the conservator shall endeavor to cooperate with the guardian or, if there is no guardian, with others who have custody of the ward.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 29/HB 95; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 29/HB 142; Ga. L. 2018, p. 1089, § 6/SB 301; Ga. L. 2019, p. 693, § 17/HB 70; Ga. L. 2022, p. 207, § 6/HB 620.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in paragraph (b)(1), deleted “or” at the end of subparagraph (b)(1)(B), added “; or” at the end of subparagraph (b)(1)(C), and added subparagraph (b)(1)(D).

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, added paragraph (c)(10) and redesignated former paragraphs (c)(10) and (c)(11) as present paragraphs (c)(11) and (c)(12), respectively.

The 2022 amendment,

effective May 2, 2022, substituted “$25,000.00” for “$15,000.00” in paragraphs (a)(13), (a)(14), (c)(5), and (c)(6).

Cross references.

Service of process on guardian of incapacitated adult, § 9-11-4(l)(4).

Contracts for labor or service by trustees and administrators, § 53-7-8 (Pre-1998 Probate Code).

Private sale of certain stocks and bonds by guardian, § 53-8-37 (Pre-1998 Probate Code).

Revised Uniform Fiduciary Access to Digital Assets Act, § 53-13-1 et seq.

Law reviews.

For note discussing and comparing the prudent man rule and the legal list rule in trustee investment, see 15 Mercer L. Rev. 530 (1964).

For article, “The Child as a Party in Interest in Custody Proceedings,” see 10 Ga. St. B.J. 577 (1974).

For article, “The Scope of Permissible Investments by Fiduciaries Under Georgia Law,” see 19 Ga. St. B.J. 6 (1982).

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (1986).

For annual survey of wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 42 Mercer L. Rev. 491 (1990).

For article, “Wills, Trusts & Administration of Estates,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 499 (2001).

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 341 (2017).

29-5-24.
Forfeiture of rights by conservator; disclosure of conflicts by conservator; transactions presenting substantial conflict in interests.

The appointment of a conservator shall not automatically cause the conservator to forfeit any rights to property.

The conservator must disclose promptly any conflict of interest between the conservator and the ward when it arises or becomes known to the conservator. The conservator must seek the court’s determination as to whether the conflict is insubstantial or whether it is in the best interest of the ward for the conservator to continue to serve and not forfeit any property right. If the court finds that the conflict of interest is substantial or contrary to the best interest of the ward, the conservator may either resign or forfeit the property interest that is the source of the conflict.

A transaction affected by a substantial conflict between personal and fiduciary interests includes any sale, encumbrance, or other transaction involving the conservatorship estate entered into by the conservator or the spouse, descendant, agent, or lawyer of the conservator or a corporation or other enterprise in which the conservator has a significant beneficial interest.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-24

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-5-25.
Oath or affirmation required of conservator.

Before entering upon the duties of the appointment, every conservator appointed pursuant to the terms of this chapter shall take an oath or affirmation before the court to perform well and truly the duties required of a conservator and to account faithfully for the estate. The oath or affirmation of a conservator may be subscribed before the judge or clerk of any probate court of this state. The judge of the probate court who appoints the conservator shall have the authority to grant a commission to a judge or clerk of any court of record of any other state to administer the oath or affirmation.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-25

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.